en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.aff
# Affix file for British English MySpell dictionary
# Also suitable as basis for Commonwealth and European English.
# Built from scratch for MySpell. Released under LGPL.
#
# David Bartlett, Andrew Brown.
# R 1.18, 11/04/05
SET ISO8859-1
TRY esijanrtolcdugmphbyfvkwqxzäüößáéêàâñESIJANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWQXZÄÜÖÉ-.

FLAG long

REP 55
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP f gh
REP f ugh
REP gh f
REP ff ugh
REP uf ough
REP uff ough
REP k ch
REP ch k
REP dg j
REP j dg
REP w ugh
REP ness ity
REP leness ility
REP ness ivity
REP eness ity
REP og ogue
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP eg e.g.
REP ie i.e.
REP t ght
REP ght t
REP ok OK
REP ts ce
REP ce ts
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP ß ss
REP ss ß
REP s ss
REP ss s
REP i ie
REP ie i
REP ee e
REP o oh
REP oh o
REP a ah
REP ah a
REP e eh
REP eh e
REP ae ä
REP oe ö
REP ue ü
REP Ae Ä
REP Oe Ö
REP Ue Ü
REP d t
REP t d
REP th t
REP t th
REP r rh
REP ch k
REP k ch
#REP eee ee-E

PFX EA Y 2
PFX EA 0 re [^e] 
PFX EA 0 re- e 
PFX Ea Y 1
PFX Ea 0 mis . 
PFX EI Y 4
PFX EI 0 il l 
PFX EI 0 ir r 
PFX EI 0 im [bmp] 
PFX EI 0 in [^blmpr] 
PFX Ec Y 1
PFX Ec 0 over . 
PFX EU Y 1
PFX EU 0 un . 
PFX EC Y 2
PFX EC 0 de [^e] 
PFX EC 0 de- e 
PFX EE Y 1
PFX EE 0 dis . 
PFX EF Y 5
PFX EF 0 com [bmp]
PFX EF 0 co [aeiouh]
PFX EF 0 cor r
PFX EF 0 col l
PFX EF 0 con [^abehilmopru]. 
PFX EK Y 1
PFX EK 0 pre . 
PFX Ee Y 1
PFX Ee 0 out . 
PFX Ef Y 2
PFX Ef 0 under [^r] 
PFX Ef 0 under- r 
PFX EO Y 1
PFX EO 0 non- . 
PFX E4 Y 1
PFX E4 0 trans . 
SFX EV Y 15
SFX EV 0 tive [aio] 
SFX EV b ptive b 
SFX EV d sive d 
SFX EV be ptive be 
SFX EV e tive ce 
SFX EV de sive de 
SFX EV ke cative ke 
SFX EV e ptive me 
SFX EV e ive [st]e 
SFX EV e ative [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX EV 0 lative [aeiou]l 
SFX EV 0 ative [^aeiou]l 
SFX EV 0 ive [st] 
SFX EV y icative y 
SFX EV 0 ative [^abdeilosty] 
SFX Ev Y 15
SFX Ev 0 tively [aio] 
SFX Ev b ptively b 
SFX Ev d sively d 
SFX Ev be ptively be 
SFX Ev e tively ce 
SFX Ev de sively de 
SFX Ev ke catively ke 
SFX Ev e ptively me 
SFX Ev e ively [st]e 
SFX Ev e atively [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX Ev 0 latively [aeiou]l 
SFX Ev 0 atively [^aeiou]l 
SFX Ev 0 ively [st] 
SFX Ev y icatively y 
SFX Ev 0 atively [^abdeilosty] 
SFX Eu Y 15
SFX Eu 0 tiveness [aio] 
SFX Eu b ptiveness b 
SFX Eu d siveness d 
SFX Eu be ptiveness be 
SFX Eu e tiveness ce 
SFX Eu de siveness de 
SFX Eu ke cativeness ke 
SFX Eu e ptiveness me 
SFX Eu e iveness [st]e 
SFX Eu e ativeness [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX Eu 0 lativeness [aeiou]l 
SFX Eu 0 ativeness [^aeiou]l 
SFX Eu 0 iveness [st] 
SFX Eu y icativeness y 
SFX Eu 0 ativeness [^abdeilosty] 
SFX EN Y 26
SFX EN b ption b 
SFX EN d sion d 
SFX EN be ption be 
SFX EN e tion ce 
SFX EN de sion de 
SFX EN ke cation ke 
SFX EN e ption ume 
SFX EN e mation [^u]me 
SFX EN e ion [^o]se 
SFX EN e ition ose 
SFX EN e ation [iou]te 
SFX EN e ion [^iou]te 
SFX EN e ation [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX EN el ulsion el 
SFX EN 0 lation [aiou]l 
SFX EN 0 ation [^aeiou]l 
SFX EN 0 mation [aeiou]m 
SFX EN 0 ation [^aeiou]m 
SFX EN er ration er 
SFX EN 0 ation [^e]r 
SFX EN 0 ion [sx] 
SFX EN t ssion mit 
SFX EN 0 ion [^m]it 
SFX EN 0 ation [^i]t 
SFX EN y ication y 
SFX EN 0 ation [^bdelmrstxy] 
SFX En Y 28
SFX En 0 tion a 
SFX En e tion ce 
SFX En ke cation ke 
SFX En e ation [iou]te 
SFX En e ion [^iou]te 
SFX En e ation [^ckt]e 
SFX En el ulsion el 
SFX En 0 lation [aiou]l 
SFX En 0 ation [^aeiou]l 
SFX En er ration er 
SFX En 0 ation [^e]r 
SFX En y ation py 
SFX En y ication [^p]y 
SFX En 0 ation [^aelry] 
SFX En 0 tions a 
SFX En e tions ce 
SFX En ke cations ke 
SFX En e ations [iou]te 
SFX En e ions [^iou]te 
SFX En e ations [^ckt]e 
SFX En el ulsions el 
SFX En 0 lations [aiou]l 
SFX En 0 ations [^aeiou]l 
SFX En er rations er 
SFX En 0 ations [^e]r 
SFX En y ations py 
SFX En y ications [^p]y 
SFX En 0 ations [^aelry] 
SFX EX Y 26
SFX EX b ptions b 
SFX EX d sions d 
SFX EX be ptions be 
SFX EX e tions ce 
SFX EX ke cations ke 
SFX EX de sions de 
SFX EX e ptions ume 
SFX EX e mations [^u]me 
SFX EX e ions [^o]se 
SFX EX e itions ose 
SFX EX e ations [iou]te 
SFX EX e ions [^iou]te 
SFX EX e ations [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX EX el ulsions el 
SFX EX 0 lations [aiou]l 
SFX EX 0 ations [^aeiou]l 
SFX EX 0 mations [aeiou]m 
SFX EX 0 ations [^aeiou]m 
SFX EX er rations er 
SFX EX 0 ations [^e]r 
SFX EX 0 ions [sx] 
SFX EX t ssions mit 
SFX EX 0 ions [^m]it 
SFX EX 0 ations [^i]t 
SFX EX y ications y 
SFX EX 0 ations [^bdelmrstxy] 
SFX Ex Y 40
SFX Ex b ptional b 
SFX Ex d sional d 
SFX Ex be ptional be 
SFX Ex e tional ce 
SFX Ex ke cational ke 
SFX Ex de sional de 
SFX Ex e ional [^o]se 
SFX Ex e itional ose 
SFX Ex e ional te 
SFX Ex e ational [^bcdkst]e 
SFX Ex el ulsional el 
SFX Ex 0 lational [aiou]l 
SFX Ex 0 ational [^aeiou]l 
SFX Ex er rational er 
SFX Ex 0 ational [^e]r 
SFX Ex 0 ional [sx] 
SFX Ex 0 ional [^n]t 
SFX Ex 0 ational nt 
SFX Ex y icational y 
SFX Ex 0 ational [^bdelrstxy] 
SFX Ex b ptionally b 
SFX Ex d sionally d 
SFX Ex be ptionally be 
SFX Ex e tionally ce 
SFX Ex ke cationally ke 
SFX Ex de sionally de 
SFX Ex e ionally [^o]se 
SFX Ex e itionally ose 
SFX Ex e ionally te 
SFX Ex e ationally [^bcdkst]e 
SFX Ex el ulsionally el 
SFX Ex 0 lationally [aiou]l 
SFX Ex 0 ationally [^aeiou]l 
SFX Ex er rationally er 
SFX Ex 0 ationally [^e]r 
SFX Ex 0 ionally [sx] 
SFX Ex 0 ionally [^n]t 
SFX Ex 0 ationally nt 
SFX Ex y icationally y 
SFX Ex 0 ationally [^bdelrstxy] 
SFX EH N 13
SFX EH y ieth y 
SFX EH ree ird ree 
SFX EH ve fth ve 
SFX EH e th [^ev]e 
SFX EH 0 h t 
SFX EH 0 th [^ety] 
SFX EH y ieths y 
SFX EH ree irds ree 
SFX EH ve fths ve 
SFX EH e ths [^ev]e 
SFX EH 0 hs t 
SFX EH 0 ths [^ety] 
SFX EH 0 fold . 
SFX EY Y 9
SFX EY 0 ally ic 
SFX EY 0 ly [^i]c 
SFX EY e y [^aeiou]le 
SFX EY 0 ly [aeiou]le 
SFX EY 0 ly [^l]e 
SFX EY 0 y [^aeiou]l 
SFX EY y ily [^aeiou]y 
SFX EY 0 ly [aeiou][ly] 
SFX EY 0 ly [^cely] 
SFX EG Y 24
SFX EG e ing [^eioy]e 
SFX EG 0 ing [eoy]e 
SFX EG ie ying ie 
SFX EG 0 bing [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX EG 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX EG 0 ding [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX EG 0 fing [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX EG 0 ging [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX EG 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX EG 0 ling [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX EG 0 ing [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX EG 0 ling [^aeo]al 
SFX EG 0 ing [aeo]al 
SFX EG 0 ming [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX EG 0 ning [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX EG 0 ping [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX EG 0 ring [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX EG 0 sing [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX EG 0 ting [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX EG 0 ving [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX EG 0 zing [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX EG 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX EG 0 ing [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX EG 0 ing [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX EJ Y 25
SFX EJ e ings [^eioy]e 
SFX EJ 0 ings [eoy]e 
SFX EJ ie yings ie 
SFX EJ 0 bings [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX EJ 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX EJ 0 dings [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX EJ 0 fings [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX EJ 0 gings [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX EJ 0 kings [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX EJ 0 lings [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX EJ 0 ings [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX EJ 0 lings [^aeo]al 
SFX EJ 0 ings [aeo]al 
SFX EJ 0 mings [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX EJ 0 nings [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX EJ 0 pings [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX EJ 0 rings [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX EJ 0 sings [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX EJ 0 tings [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX EJ 0 vings [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX EJ 0 zings [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX EJ 0 ings [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX EJ 0 ings [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX EJ 0 ings [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX EJ 0 ings [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX Ek Y 8
SFX Ek e ingly [^eioy]e 
SFX Ek 0 ingly [eoy]e 
SFX Ek ie yingly ie 
SFX Ek 0 kingly [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Ek 0 lingly [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Ek 0 ingly [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX Ek 0 ingly [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX Ek 0 ingly [^ecl] 
