en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.dic
agreeable/EPEE
allude/EvEDEGEVEuEXESEN
alternate/ENEVEvEuESEDEGEYEn
amble/EKES
annotate/EGEnENEVEDES
anthropic/Ea
appreciate/EvEyEGEVEDENEnEuES
apprehend/EDEvENEVESEGEuEX
apprehension/EaEMES
arguably/EIEU
arranged/EEEKEA
assembling/EA
assuaged/EU
authorize/EKEA
balancing/EAEcEUEe
baser/EC
bearing/Ec
beguile/EDERELESEGEk
belief/ESEMEE
blah/EMEDESEG
boorish/EYEP
bruise/EREGESEDEJ
buffered/EU
building/EMEeES
came/Ec
capitation/ECEMES
captured/EA
carriage/EaESEMEf
centric/EF
circumcise/EDESEGENEX
circumnavigate/EDENEnESExEG
circumscribe/ESEXEDENEG
clatter/EdESEZEk
clinometer/ESEIEM
clothing/EMEf
code/ECEDEaEAEGES
coder/E4ESECEM
cohabit/EnEd
col/ESENEVEnEW
collaborate/EVEGEDENESEvEn
collimated/EU
colour/EqEQE-E8ERENEpEGEJESEnEDE6EjEM
combat/EvEVEu
comfits/EE
committed/EcEU
compare/EuEVEvEGEBEl
compress/EXEvENEVEhExEb
conception/EKESEMEa
concise/ETEYEPENEX
configurable/EK
connection's/EA
contamination/EMECES
contemplate/EVENEDEvEuEGEn
continuation/EMEE
contraindicate/EVESENEnEDEG
convulse/EGEXEDESEVEuENEv
correct/ETExEvEPESEDEuEGEYE7EV
corrigible/EI
corrode/EDEvEbEGEuESEXENEV
couples/EU
courser/EEESEM
cries/Ee
crisp/EGEYEPEDETEZE2ES
damn/ElEDEGEkENESE7En
dazzle/ESEREGEkED
decide/EDEBEGEVEiEvEhENExEXEuES
defect/EGEuESEDEMEVEv
defend/EVEuEv
deliberate/EPEuEvEYEV
dense/EFEY
depute/ESEnEQE8ENEGEDEZ
designed/EA
destruct/EbEvEVEuEGEDES
determines/EKEA
develop/EcEdEAES
diagnose/EDEGEaES
diffuse/EPESEvEYEREDEGEuEbENExEXEV
dim/ErESEREPEYEDETEG
direct/ETExEPEDEGEyESEYEV
discontinue/EnEN
disjunct/EVEv
disposition/EKEMEI
disputed/EU
dissuade/EVEDEGES
dizzy/EPETEYEDESEGEk
does/EeEcEUEA
dog's/Ef
drown/EGEJEDES
eaten/EUEc
effect/EDEuEGEvEVESEM
effuse/ENEDEvEuEVESEGEX
eighty-nine/EH
elevate/EDESEnEGEN
enter/EAEdES
ergonomic/EU
estimations/Ef
evident/EY
evoke/EVEGEuEvESEnEDEN
execrate/ESEGEVEnENED
exercising/Ec
exhume/EGEDESEn
exist/EFEGESED
exponentiate/EGEnEDESEN
extend/EiEDEREVEvEhEGENESExEuEbEX
exult/ENEnEkEGEDES
fall's/EcEe
feasibility/EI
fer/EKELEFEC
ferule/ESEDEGEM
fiction/EMESEOEo
fifty-five/EH
figuration/EMEKE4EF
file/ECEaESEAEGED
flank/EeESEDEG
flavour/EREME6EDEGEJESEp
focal/EFEY
formation/EMEFEIECE4ES
forms/EAEKECE4
forty-eight/EH
fourteen/EHESEM
fund/EAESEDEGEM
garment's/Ef
gentrify/EnESEDEGEN
giving/EaEY
glare/EkESEDEG
glycerolized/EC
gorger/EEEM
gratuitous/EPEY
ground/EmEREMEGEJEDEpES
grows/EcEAEe
growth/EeESEAEIEMEcEf
habitant/EIEFESEM
hallucinate/EnEyENEVEGEDES
heat/EREJE7EMEGEDESEh
heralded/EU
hospitably/EI
houses/EeEA
illustrate/ENEnEGEDEvESEV
imagine/ElEnESEVEuENEJEDEvEG
imitate/EDEVEGEvENEuEnES
immerse/ESENEbEDEGEX
inflate/EDESEGENEn
inform/EaENEGEDES
inhibit/ESEVEdEyEXEN
insinuate/EDEGEkEnENESEV
instituted/EA
integrate/EEEAEDESEGEN
interject/ExEGESED
interrogate/ESEGENEyEvEDEVEn
intraregional/EY
jack/EMEDERESEJEG
judicial/EKEY
junction/EFESEMEIEE
juxtapose/ESEDEXEGEN
lax/EvEuETEYESEPEV
lend/ESEREG
limiter/ECEMES
lined/EfEUEAEe
list/EDEGEJEp
literate/E4ENES
loaded/EAEKEcEU
manifest/EDEYESEGENEn
manned/EfEU
manoeuvred/Ee
marks/EA
mines/Ef
mission/EFERESEM
mission's/EAE4
monocular/ESEY
morn/EGEMESEJ
motes/EC
mute/EFEnE4ENEDESEG
natal/EK
nauseate/EGEDESEk
ninety-four/EH
notate/ExEDESEVEG
numerate/EIES
oblate/EYESEnEN
obliterate/EDENEvEnESEVEG
obsess/ENExEXEVESEuEDEGEv
operative/EFEPES
or/ENEMEn
organise/EEEnEAEDEGES
packages/EA
pant/ESEDEG
paying/EKEfEc
penetrate/EvENEnEBESEDEVEkEuEG
perceive/EaESED
personalize/ECESENEGEn
picturesque/EPEY
plaint/EuESEvEMEV
plant/EIEGESEDEAE4
plication/EFEMEIEA
plosive/EI
porting/EFEEE4
pose/EFENECERExEDEGESEEEX
posing/EAEIE4
possess/EEEGEKEDESENEAEX
pouring/Ee
prevent/ElEuE7EvEV
probation's/EA
professionally/EU
prolong/EnESEDENEG
provoke/EVEuESENEREGEkEnEvED
punctuate/EDESEGExEnEN
quieter/EE
rail/ECEDESEGEJ
rate/EcEDEGES
rationally/EI
recertify/EN
recess/EGEMENEuESEXEDEVEv
recurs/ENEXEvEV
reported/EfEaEU
reporting/EaEf
restore/EgEREnEVENEv
rigorous/EY
riving/EC
schools/EK
sciences/EFEK
scrupulous/EYEU
sell/EAESEcEeEGEf
seven/EHEMES
seventy-six/EH
shiver/EdEkEZES
sight-read/EREG
sixty-nine/EH
slept/Ec
sobriety/EIESEM
soluble/EEEI
sorted/EUEK
spending/Ef
spoken/EUEeEa
stodgy/ETEY
stretch/EeEGEDES
sub-head/EJ
suggest/EREGEuEVEvESEDEb
sum/E8ENESEREMEXEDEG
support/EvEREDEkESEBEGEV
syllabify/EGENESEnED
synchronise/ECESEAEGED
synchronized/ECEU
tap/EdErEREDEMEGES
taught/EAEU
textual/EFEY
thirty-five/EH
throws/Ec
treated/EKEUEAEa
trillion/EHES
unyielding/EY
using/EfEaEcEA
variate/EMEnExENES
vented/EKEI
verses/E4EI
viewer/EAEKESEM
wither/Ek
yank/ESEGED
